Florida, session 2026, HB501.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 501 2026
51
52 Section 1. Part XIII of chapter 288, Florida Statutes,
53 consisting of ss. 288.9991-288.9998, Florida Statutes, is
54 created and entitled "Construction Disruption Assistance Act."
55 Section 2. Section 288.9991, Florida Statutes, is created
56 to read:
57 288.9991 Short title.—This part shall be known and may be
58 cited as the "Construction Disruption Assistance Act."
59 Section 3. Section 288.9992, Florida Statutes, is created
60 to read:
61 288.9992 Legislative findings; purpose.—The Legislature
62 finds and declares that:
63 (1) Prolonged state and local government construction
64 projects that directly block access to small businesses cause
65 significant financial and operational hardships that negatively
66 impact local economies and threaten the livelihoods of business
67 owners and employees.
68 (2) It is the purpose of this act to establish a program
69 to provide financial relief, promotional support, and loss
70 coverage to small businesses adversely impacted by state and
71 local government construction projects, ensuring the resilience
72 and viability of affected businesses during essential
73 infrastructure improvements.
74 Section 4. Section 288.9993, Florida Statutes, is created
75 to read:
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 501 2026
76 288.9993 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
77 (1) "Construction zone" means the immediate area where
78 construction activities directly restrict physical or visual
79 access to a small business, including partial or complete
80 obstruction of entryways, parking, or signage visibility.
81 (2) "Demonstrable loss" means a verifiable reduction in
82 revenue, increased operating costs, or property damage directly
83 attributed to state or local government construction activities.
84 (3) "Department" means the Department of Commerce.
85 (4) "Eligible small business" means a business with 50 or
86 fewer employees whose primary access points are obstructed by
87 state or local government construction activities directly
88 adjacent to or in front of the business, as determined by the
89 department.
90 (5) "Program" means the Construction Impact Relief
91 Revolving Loan Program established in s. 288.9995.
92 Section 5. Section 288.9994, Florida Statutes, is created
93 to read:
94 288.9994 Rulemaking authority.—By October 1, 2026, the
95 department shall adopt rules to implement this part, including,
96 but not limited to, developing guidelines for the award of loans
97 under the program and creating application forms for the
98 program.
99 Section 6. Section 288.9995, Florida Statutes, is created
100 to read:
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 501 2026
101 288.9995 Construction Impact Relief Revolving Loan
102 Program.—
103 (1) The Construction Impact Relief Revolving Loan Program
104 is created within the department. The program may be funded by
105 the Legislature. Under the program, the department shall:
106 (a) Provide financial assistance to eligible small
107 businesses within construction zones, including low-interest
108 loans of up to $100,000, with interest not to exceed the federal
109 funds rate at the time the loan is issued, for the operating
110 costs of eligible small businesses during construction
111 disruptions.
112 (b) Develop a public awareness and marketing campaign to
113 promote the program in partnership with local chambers of
114 commerce and other business organizations and to encourage
115 customer support for small businesses adversely impacted by
116 state and local government construction activities. Such
117 marketing campaign efforts must include, but are not limited to,
118 all of the following:
119 1. Digital advertising campaigns.
120 2. Signage and outreach.
121 (2) An applicant seeking to obtain financial assistance
122 under paragraph (1)(a) must submit an application to the
123 department. The application must require documentation of
124 demonstrable loss and a plan for the use of funds. Proof of
125 demonstrable loss must include, but is not limited to, all of
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 501 2026
126 the following:
127 (a) Documentation of reduction in revenue from the start
128 date of the state or local government construction activities to
129 the week before an application is submitted to the department.
130 Such proof may be made by comparing the applicant's average
131 weekly or monthly revenue of the year before the state or local
132 government construction activities began and the applicant's
133 current weekly or monthly revenue.
134 (b) Photo or video evidence of the obstruction to the
135 applicant due to the construction zone. Such obstruction may
136 include, but is not limited to, any of the following:
137 1. Restricting parking or primary entry access to the
138 eligible small business.
139 2. Blocking visibility of the applicant's premises from
140 all directions of traffic flow along the road and adjoining
141 sidewalks where the applicant is located, during each phase of
142 construction.
143 (3) An applicant must agree to accept consultation from
144 the Florida Small Business Development Center Network created in
145 s. 288.001 as a condition to participate in the program. If an
146 applicant is enrolled in any other loan program, the business is
147 not eligible to participate in the program.
148 Section 7. Section 288.9996, Florida Statutes, is created
149 to read:
150 288.9996 Publication on department website;
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 501 2026
151 accessibility.—
152 (1) The department shall maintain and publish detailed
153 information about the program on its website. The information
154 must include, but is not limited to, all of the following:
155 (a) A clear description of the application process.
156 (b) Detailed eligibility criteria for applicants.
157 (c) The timeline and procedures for review, approval, and
158 disbursement of funds.
159 (d) Contact information, including e-mail addresses and
160 telephone numbers, applicants or interested parties may use to
161 obtain additional information or assistance.
162 (2) The department shall update the information as changes
163 occur and shall ensure that the website is accessible to all
164 potential applicants or interested parties, including those with
165 disabilities, in accordance with applicable state and federal
166 accessibility laws.
167 Section 8. Section 288.9997, Florida Statutes, is created
168 to read:
169 288.9997 Liability.—
170 (1) The department or any of its officers, employees,
171 agents, or contractors may not be held liable in any civil
172 action arising out of or relating to the administration,
173 processing, approval, denial, or disbursement of funds under the
174 program.
175 (2) An applicant must acknowledge that, as a condition of
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 501 2026
176 applying to the program, submitting an application does not
177 guarantee funding and that the department is not liable for any
178 damages, including, but not limited to, lost profits or business
179 interruptions resulting from the department denying a loan or
180 delaying disbursement of a loan, or from government construction
181 activities.
182 (3) This part may not be construed to create a private
183 right of action against the department or any of its officers,
184 employees, agents, or contractors. Eligibility determinations,
185 prioritization of applications, and loan award decisions made in
186 accordance with applicable program rules and guidelines are
187 considered final agency action and are not subject to further
188 judicial review except as provided in s. 120.68.
189 (4) The department may adopt rules establishing clear
190 application procedures, evaluation criteria, and dispute
191 resolution processes to ensure consistency and transparency in
192 program administration.
193 Section 9. Section 288.9998, Florida Statutes, is created
194 to read:
195 288.9998 Annual reporting requirement.—The department
196 shall, by November 1 of each year, submit an annual report to
197 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of
198 the House of Representatives which summarizes the performance of
199 the program, including the total number of small businesses and
200 residents served, the total funds disbursed, and the outcomes of
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 501 2026
201 the program.
202 Section 10. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb501-00